District of Columbia statutes.
34-217

“Street railroad corporation” defined.

The term “street railroad corporation” when used in this subtitle includes every corporation, company, association, joint-stock company or association, partnership, and person doing business in the District of Columbia, their lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever, owning, operating, controlling, or managing any street railroad or any cars or other equipment used thereon or in connection therewith.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 975, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-210.
1973 Ed., § 43-110.